dev/verbs/tgl.lexc
Multichar_Symbols  +V +Inf +Cont +Prog +Comp +Imp
				   +Obj1 +Obj2 +Obj3 
                   +Act1 +Act2 +Act3 +Act4 
				   +Loc +Ben +Ins +Rea 
				   +Dir +Recip ! unused at the moment
                   +INF ! this for testing

                   %> %^UM %^INF %^IN %^FILL %^INDRE

                   @R.ALPH.a@ @P.ALPH.a@
                   @R.ALPH.b@ @P.ALPH.b@
                   @R.ALPH.c@ @P.ALPH.c@
                   @R.ALPH.d@ @P.ALPH.d@
                   @R.ALPH.e@ @P.ALPH.e@
                   @R.ALPH.f@ @P.ALPH.f@
                   @R.ALPH.g@ @P.ALPH.g@
                   @R.ALPH.h@ @P.ALPH.h@
                   @R.ALPH.i@ @P.ALPH.i@
                   @R.ALPH.j@ @P.ALPH.j@
                   @R.ALPH.k@ @P.ALPH.k@
                   @R.ALPH.l@ @P.ALPH.l@
                   @R.ALPH.m@ @P.ALPH.m@
                   @R.ALPH.n@ @P.ALPH.n@
                   @R.ALPH.o@ @P.ALPH.o@
                   @R.ALPH.p@ @P.ALPH.p@
                   @R.ALPH.q@ @P.ALPH.q@
                   @R.ALPH.r@ @P.ALPH.r@
                   @R.ALPH.s@ @P.ALPH.s@
                   @R.ALPH.t@ @P.ALPH.t@
                   @R.ALPH.u@ @P.ALPH.u@
                   @R.ALPH.v@ @P.ALPH.v@
                   @R.ALPH.w@ @P.ALPH.w@
                   @R.ALPH.x@ @P.ALPH.x@
                   @R.ALPH.y@ @P.ALPH.y@
                   @R.ALPH.z@ @P.ALPH.z@



                   @D.PREF@ @C.PREF@
				   @D.INFX@ @C.INFX@

				   @P.PREF.i@
                   @P.PREF.mag@
                   @P.PREF.ma@
                   @P.PREF.mang@
                   @P.PREF.ipaN@
                   @P.PREF.ika@
                   @P.PREF.CV@
                   @P.PREF.iCV@
                   @P.PREF.magCV@
                   @P.PREF.maCV@
                   @P.PREF.mangCV@
                   @P.PREF.ipaNCV@
                   @P.PREF.ikaCV@
                   @P.PREF.CinV@
                   @P.PREF.iCinV@
                   @P.PREF.CumV@
                   @P.PREF.nagCV@
                   @P.PREF.naCV@
                   @P.PREF.nangCV@
                   @P.PREF.ipinaNCV@
                   @P.PREF.ikinaCV@
                   @P.PREF.nag@
                   @P.PREF.na@
                   @P.PREF.nang@
                   @P.PREF.ipinaN@
                   @P.PREF.ikina@
                   @P.PREF.pang@
                   @P.PREF.pag@
                  
				   @R.PREF.i@
                   @R.PREF.mag@
                   @R.PREF.ma@
                   @R.PREF.mang@
                   @R.PREF.ipaN@
                   @R.PREF.ika@
                   @R.PREF.CV@
                   @R.PREF.iCV@
                   @R.PREF.magCV@
                   @R.PREF.maCV@
                   @R.PREF.mangCV@
                   @R.PREF.ipaNCV@
                   @R.PREF.ikaCV@
                   @R.PREF.CinV@
                   @R.PREF.iCinV@
                   @R.PREF.CumV@
                   @R.PREF.nagCV@
                   @R.PREF.naCV@
                   @R.PREF.nangCV@
                   @R.PREF.ipinaNCV@
                   @R.PREF.ikinaCV@
                   @R.PREF.nag@
                   @R.PREF.na@
                   @R.PREF.nang@
                   @R.PREF.ipinaN@
                   @R.PREF.ikina@
                   @R.PREF.pang@
                   @R.PREF.pag@

                   @P.INFX.in@
				   @P.INFX.um@

				   @R.INFX.in@
				   @R.INFX.um@

				   @P.CV.PREF@ @R.CV.PREF@ @D.CV@
				   @P.CV.INFX@ @R.CV.INFX@

LEXICON Root
Prefixes ;

LEXICON Prefixes
@P.PREF.i@:i			CVCheck ;
@P.PREF.mag@:mag		CVCheck ;
@P.PREF.ma@:ma			CVCheck ;
@P.PREF.mang@:mang		CVCheck ;
@P.PREF.ipaN@:ipaN		CVCheck ;
@P.PREF.ika@:ika		CVCheck ;

@P.PREF.nag@:nag		CVCheck ;
@P.PREF.na@:na			CVCheck ;
@P.PREF.nang@:nang		CVCheck ;
@P.PREF.ipinaN@:ipinaN 	CVCheck ;
@P.PREF.ikina@:ikina	CVCheck ;

@P.PREF.pag@:pag		CVCheck ;
@P.PREF.pang@:pang		CVCheck ;
						CVCheck ;

LEXICON CVCheck
@P.CV.PREF@:RE+					Alph;
@P.CV.INFX@@P.INFX.um@:SumE+	Alph;
@P.CV.INFX@@P.INFX.in@:SinE+	Alph;
								Alph;

LEXICON Alph
@P.ALPH.a@a	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.b@b	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.c@c	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.d@d	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.e@e	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.f@f	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.g@g	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.h@h	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.i@i	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.j@j	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.k@k	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.l@l	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.m@m	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.n@n	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.o@o	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.p@p	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.q@q	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.r@r	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.s@s	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.t@t	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.u@u	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.v@v	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.w@w	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.x@x	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.y@y	Infixes ;
@P.ALPH.z@z	Infixes ;

LEXICON Infixes
@D.CV@@P.INFX.um@:um	PartStems ;
@D.CV@@P.INFX.in@:in	PartStems ;
						PartStems ;

LEXICON PartStems 
@R.ALPH.b@ili	RegSuffixes ;
@R.ALPH.l@inis	RegSuffixes ;
